North Carolina, session 2025, SB306.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 97-130 reads as rewritten:
"§ 97-130. Definitions.
As used The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) "Association" means the Association. – The North Carolina Self-Insurance
Security Association established by G.S. 97-131.
(1a) "Association Aggregate Security System" means the Association Aggregate
Security System. – The security system established by the Association under
G.S. 97-133 whereby individual self-insurers collectively secure their
aggregate self-insured workers' compensation liabilities incurred while a
member through the North Carolina Self-Insurance Security Association.
(2) "Board" means the Board. – The Board of Directors of the Association
established by G.S. 97-132.
(2a) Collateral. – Cash, certificates of deposits, surety bonds, or irrevocable letters
of credit provided or pledged to the Association under G.S. 97-133(a)(2a)g.
(3) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner. – The North Carolina
Commissioner of Insurance.
(4) "Covered claim" means an Covered claim. – An unpaid claim against an
insolvent individual self-insurer or group self-insurer that which relates to an
injury that occurs while the individual self-insurer or group self-insurer is a
member of the Association and that is compensable under this Chapter.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, no workers' compensation claim filed against
the Association more than five years after the applicable claims bar date
established by a court of competent jurisdiction in the insolvency proceeding
of a former member self-insurer shall be considered a covered claim against
the Association.
(5) "Fund" means the Fund. – The North Carolina Self-Insurance Security Fund
established by G.S. 97-133.
(5a) "Group" or "Group self-insurer" means a Group or group self-insurer. – A
group self-insurer licensed by the Commissioner under Part 1, Article 47 of
Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.
(5b) "Individual self-insurer" means an Individual self-insurer. – An individual
employer licensed by the Commissioner under Article 5 of this Chapter.
*S306-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) "Member self-insurer" or "member" means an Member self-insurer or
member. – An individual self-insurer or group self-insurer that is required to
be a member of the Association under this Article or Part 1, Article 47 of
Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.
(7) "Plan" means the Plan. – The Plan of Operation authorized by G.S. 97-134.
(8) Repealed by Session Laws 2005-400, s. 1.2, effective January 1, 2006.
(9) "Servicing facility" means those Servicing facility. – Those persons delegated
by the Board to settle or compromise claims and to expend Fund assets to pay
claims."
SECTION 2. G.S. 97-133(a)(2a) reads as rewritten:
"(2a) Establish and operate the Association Aggregate Security System as defined
in G.S. 97-130 and G.S. 97-165 as follows:
a. The Association shall annually operate and provide an Association
Aggregate Security System through a combination of cash on deposit
in the Fund, securities, surety bonds, irrevocable letters of credit,
insurance, reinsurance, or other financial instruments or guarantees
owned or entered into by the Association. The Association shall assess
the individual self-insurers that participate in the Association
Aggregate Security System pursuant to subdivision (3a) of this
subsection.
b. through d. Repealed by Session Laws 2011-196, s. 10, effective July
1, 2011.
e. If the Association determines it is not feasible or practical to operate
the Association Aggregate Security System in any given year, it may
terminate or suspend the Association Aggregate Security System and
shall notify the Commissioner at least 90 days prior to the termination
or suspension of the Association Aggregate Security System for that
particular year. During any period that the Associate Aggregate
Security System is terminated or suspended, every self-insurer shall
deposit with the Commissioner, or continue to deposit, the amount
required by G.S. 97-185(b3) in the manner prescribed by
G.S. 97-185(c).
f. Group self-insurers shall not participate in the Association Aggregate
Security System.
g. As a precondition to continued participation in the Association
Aggregate Security System, the Association may require participating
self-insurers as provided in G.S. 97-185(a1) to provide collateral as
defined in G.S. 97-165(3a) and G.S. 97-130(2a) with the Association
based upon the financial condition of the participating self-insurer."
SECTION 3. Article 4 of Chapter 97 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 97-144. Statute of repose.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, a workers' compensation claim must be
filed against the Association within five years after the claims bar date established by a court of
competent jurisdiction in the insolvency proceeding of a former member self-insurer. Any claim
not filed within the five-year period shall be forever barred as a claim against the Association."
SECTION 4. G.S. 97-165 reads as rewritten:
"§ 97-165. Definitions.
As used The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) "Act" means the Act. – The Workers' Compensation Act established in Article
1 of this Chapter.
Page 2 Senate Bill 306-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1a) "Affiliate of" or "person affiliated with" a specific person means a Affiliate of
or person affiliated with a specific person. – A person that indirectly through
one or more intermediaries or directly controls, is controlled by, or is under
common control with the person specified.
(1b) Association. – The North Carolina Self-Insurance Security Association
established by G.S. 97-131.
(1c) "Association Aggregate Security System" means the Association Aggregate
Security System. – The security system established pursuant to G.S. 97-133
whereby individual self-insurers collectively secure their aggregate
self-insured workers' compensation liabilities incurred while a member under
the Act through the North Carolina Self-Insurance Security Association.
(2) "Certified audit" means an Certified audit. – An audit on which a certified
public accountant or a foreign registered public accounting firm expresses his
or her professional opinion that the accompanying statements fairly present
the financial position of the self-insurer or the guarantor, in conformity with
accounting principles generally accepted in the United States or prepared in
accordance with International Financial Reporting Standards.
(3) "Certified public accountant" or "CPA" means a Certified Public Accountant
or CPA. – A CPA who is in good standing with the American Institute of
Certified Public Accountants and in all states in which the CPA is licensed to
practice. A CPA shall be recognized as independent as long as the CPA
conforms to the standards of the profession, as contained in the Code of
Professional Ethics of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants
and Rules and Regulations and Code of Ethics and Rules of Professional
Conduct of the North Carolina State Board of Certified Public Accountant
Examiners, or similar code. The Commissioner may hold a hearing to
determine whether a CPA is independent and, considering the evidence
presented, may rule that the CPA is not independent for purposes of
expressing an opinion on financial statements prepared in accordance with
United States Generally Accepted Accounting Principles or International
Financial Reporting Standards. The Commission may require the self-insurer
or the guarantor to replace the CPA with another whose relationship with the
self-insurer or the guarantor is independent within the meaning of this
definition.
(3a) Collateral. – Cash, certificates of deposits, surety bonds, or irrevocable letters
of credit provided or pledged to the Association under G.S. 97-133(a)(2a)g.
(4) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner. – The Commissioner of Insurance.
(4a) "Control", "controlling", "controlled by", and "under common control with"
mean the Control, controlling, controlled by, and under common control with.
– The direct or indirect possession of the power to direct or cause the direction
of the management and policies of a person through ownership of or through
proxies for voting of greater than fifty percent (50%) of the voting securities,
or in the case of a not-for-profit entity, the power to direct or cause the
direction of the management and policies of the entity.
(5) "Corporate surety" means an Corporate surety. – An insurance company
authorized by the Commissioner to write surety business in this State.
(5a) "Financial statement" means a Financial statement. – A financial statement as
defined by accounting principles generally accepted in the United States or a
financial statement prepared in accordance with International Financial
Reporting Standards.
Senate Bill 306-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) "Foreign registered public accounting firm" means a Foreign registered public
accounting firm. – A public accounting firm that is organized and operates
under the laws of a non-United States jurisdiction, government, or political
subdivision and is registered and in good standing with the Public Company
Accounting Oversight Board and authorized by the Board to prepare or issue
any audit report with respect to any issuer.
(6a) "Guarantor" means a Guarantor. – A person within the same holding company
system who controls the applicant, whose financial statement is used by the
applicant to become a self-insurer under the Act, and who has guaranteed the
payment of the self-insurer's liability under the Act.
(7) "Hazardous financial condition" means that, Hazardous financial condition. –
That, based on its present or reasonably anticipated financial condition, a
self-insurer or guarantor is insolvent or, although not yet financially impaired
or insolvent, is unlikely to be able to meet its obligations with respect to
known claims and reasonably anticipated claims or to pay other obligations in
the normal course of business.
(7a) "Holding company system" means an Holding company. – An entity
comprising two or more affiliated persons.
(7b) Member self-insurer or member. – An individual self-insurer or group
self-insurer that is required to be a member of the Association under
G.S. 97-130(6), Article 4 of Chapter 97 of the General Statutes, or Part 1 of
Article 47 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.
(8) "Management" means those Management. – Those persons who are
authorized to direct or control the operations of a self-insurer.
(8a) "Person" means an Person. – An individual, corporation, partnership, limited
liability company, association, joint stock company, trust, unincorporated
organization, or any similar entity or any combination of the foregoing acting
in concert.
(9) "Qualified actuary" means a Qualified actuary. – A member in good standing
of the Casualty Actuarial Society or a member in good standing of the
American Academy of Actuaries, who has been approved as qualified for
signing casualty loss reserve opinions by the Casualty Practice Council of the
American Academy of Actuaries, and is in compliance with G.S. 58-2-171.
(10) "Self-insurer" means an Self-insurer. – An individual self-insurer as defined
by G.S. 97-130(5b).
(11) "Subsidiary of" a specific person means an Subsidiary of a specific person. –
An affiliate controlled by such person indirectly through one or more
intermediaries or an affiliate directly controlled by such person."
SECTION 5. G.S. 97-185(a1) reads as rewritten:
"(a1) All individual self-insurers as defined in G.S. 97-130(5b) shall participate in the
Association Aggregate Security System established under G.S. 97-131 unless excluded by the
Board of Directors of the North Carolina Self-Insurance Security Association. The Board of
Directors of the North Carolina Self-Insurance Security Association shall exclude all of the
following from the Association Aggregate Security System:
(1) Individual self-insurers whose licenses have previously been revoked by the
Commissioner.
(2) Individual self-insurers with a debt rating as established by Standard & Poor's
Rating Service or by Moody's Investor Service, below the minimum Standard
& Poor's or Moody's ratings if a minimum debt rating has been established by
the Board of Directors of the North Carolina Self-Insurance Security
Association for the Association Aggregate Security System.
Page 4 Senate Bill 306-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Individual self-insurers that have defaulted on the payment of their
self-insured workers' compensation liabilities.liabilities incurred while a
member.
(4) Individual self-insurers that fail to submit sufficient financial information to
enable the Association to determine their total outstanding workers'
compensation liabilities, or their creditworthiness, or both.both or fail to
provide collateral to the Association in accordance with G.S. 97-133(a)(2a)g.
The Board of Directors of the North Carolina Self-Insurance Security Association shall notify
the Commissioner of the individual self-insurers that are excluded from participating in the
Association Aggregate Security System."
SECTION 6. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 306-First Edition Page 5